Nevada, session 83, AB328.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 231 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 1.1 to 1.8, inclusive, of
this act.
Sec. 1.1. As used in sections 1.1 to 1.8, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 1.2 to 1.5, inclusive, of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 1.2. “Commission” means the Juneteenth Educational
and Economic Commission created by section 1.6 of this act.
Sec. 1.3. “Department” means the Department of Tourism
and Cultural Affairs.
Sec. 1.4. “Director” means the Director of the Department.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 1.5. “Fund” means the Juneteenth Educational and
Economic Fund created by section 1.8 of this act.
Sec. 1.6. 1. The Juneteenth Educational and Economic
Commission is hereby created within the Department.
2. The Juneteenth Educational and Economic Commission is
composed of eight voting members appointed by the Governor
based on recommendations from the Director, as follows:
(a) One member from the African-American studies
department or similar cultural studies program at the University of
Nevada, Las Vegas;
(b) One member from the African-American studies
department or similar cultural studies program at the University of
Nevada, Reno;
(c) One member from the African-American studies
department or similar cultural studies program at the Nevada
State College;
(d) One representative of Juneteenth Nevada or any successor
nonprofit organization in this State whose mission is focused on
Juneteenth Day education, unity and diversity;
(e) One member who represents a professional association
representing African-American businesses;
(f) One member who represents an African-American cultural
awareness advocacy group;
(g) One member who represents an educational advocacy
group with a statewide presence; and
(h) One member who represents a museum or cultural history
organization in this State.
3. The term of each voting member of the Commission is 4
years. Members may be reappointed for 1 additional term of 4
years. Any vacancy occurring in the membership of the
Commission must be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment.
4. The Commission shall meet once each calendar quarter. At
the first regular meeting of each year, the members of the
Commission shall select a Chair and Vice Chair by majority vote
who shall serve until the next Chair and Vice Chair is elected.
5. A majority of members of the Commission constitutes a
quorum for the transaction of business, and a majority of those
members present at any meeting is sufficient for any official
action taken by the Commission.
6. To the extent that funding is available, the Department
shall provide administrative support to the Commission as
necessary for the Commission to carry out its duties.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
Sec. 1.7. The Commission shall to the extent practicable:
1. Create and distribute written, electronic or printed
materials to educate the public on the history and meaning of
Juneteenth Day in the State of Nevada and the United States;
2. Develop strategies with businesses, nonprofit organizations
and community groups to support education in this State on the
significance of Juneteenth Day;
3. Support the efforts of businesses, community groups and
local governments to establish events and programs relating to
Juneteenth Day throughout the State; and
4. Support programs in the arts to celebrate Juneteenth Day.
Sec. 1.8. 1. There is hereby created the Juneteenth
Educational and Economic Fund in the State Treasury, to be
administered by the Director, for the support of the Commission.
2. Any interest earned on money in the Fund must be credited
to the Fund.
3. Money that remains in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year
does not revert to the State General Fund, and the balance in the
Fund must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
4. The Director may accept gifts, bequests, grants,
appropriations and donations from any source for deposit in the
Fund.
5. Local governments that celebrate Juneteenth Day shall, to
the extent practicable, contribute to the Fund and otherwise
collaborate on the development and coordination of formal
celebrations for Juneteenth Day.
Sec. 1.9. 1. The Subcommittee to Study and Develop Policy
Recommendations for African-Americans of the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Education is hereby created to conduct the
study described in section 2 of this act during the 2025-2026
interim.
2. The Subcommittee consists of the following ten members
appointed by the Chair of the Joint Interim Standing Committee on
Education:
(a) Two members of the general public from a list of at least
three persons recommended by the President of the University of
Nevada, Las Vegas, or his or her designee;
(b) Two members of the general public from a list of at least
three persons recommended by the President of the University of
Nevada, Reno, or his or her designee;
(c) Two members of the Senate recommended by the Majority
Leader of the Senate;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(d) Two members of the Assembly recommended by the
Speaker of the Assembly;
(e) One member of the Senate recommended by the Minority
Leader of the Senate; and
(f) One member of the Assembly recommended by the Minority
Leader of the Assembly.
3. Members of the Subcommittee must be recommended and
appointed on the basis of their education, training and experience in
the fields of African-American studies or reparatory justice or any
interrelated disciplines or subject matter areas or any other relevant
policy or professional experience.
4. Any vacancy occurring in the membership of the
Subcommittee must be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment.
5. For each day or portion of a day during which a member of
the Subcommittee who is a Legislator attends a meeting of the
Subcommittee or is otherwise engaged in the business of the
Subcommittee, the member is entitled to receive:
(a) The compensation provided for a majority of the Legislators
during the first 60 days of the preceding regular session;
(b) The per diem allowance provided for state officers and
employees generally; and
(c) The travel expenses provided pursuant to NRS 218A.655.
6. While engaged in the business of the Subcommittee, the
members of the Subcommittee who are not Legislators are entitled
to the per diem allowance and travel expenses provided for state
officers and employees generally.
7. All compensation, per diem allowances and travel expenses
provided pursuant to subsections 5 and 6 must be paid from the
Legislative Fund.
8. The Chair of the Joint Interim Standing Committee on
Education shall appoint a Chair and Vice Chair of the Subcommittee
from among the members of the Subcommittee appointed pursuant
to paragraphs (c) to (f), inclusive, of subsection 2. The Chair of the
Subcommittee must be appointed from one House and the Vice
Chair of the Subcommittee from the other House. If a vacancy
occurs in the office of the Chair or Vice Chair of the Subcommittee,
the vacancy must be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment.
9. Except as otherwise ordered by the Legislative Commission,
the Subcommittee shall meet not earlier than November 1, 2025,
and not later than August 31, 2026, at the times and places specified
by a call of the Chair.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
10. A majority of the members of the Subcommittee constitutes
a quorum, and a quorum may exercise all the powers and authority
conferred on the Subcommittee.
Sec. 2. 1. The Subcommittee created by section 1.9 of this
act shall study:
(a) The economic, political, social, educational and historical
impacts of slavery, Jim Crow laws, de jure and de facto racial
segregation and other forms of racial discrimination in the State of
Nevada, as well as the prior organized and unorganized territories
that constitute a part of the current state boundaries of the State;
(b) Discriminatory habits or practices, including, without
limitation, forced slavery, chattel slavery, indentured servitude,
redlining, segregated school systems and segregated public goods
and spaces, that may have caused significant economic or societal
disparities of formerly enslaved Africans or their descendants; and
(c) The related economic effects to present day society in the
State of Nevada as a result of the matters studied pursuant to this
subsection.
2. On or before August 31, 2026, the Subcommittee shall
present its findings and make recommendations, including specific
policy recommendations, relating to its findings to the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Education for:
(a) Methods to educate the general public of the State of Nevada
of the Subcommittee’s findings and recommendations;
(b) Advancement of racial healing, understanding and
transformation; and
(c) Forms of rehabilitation or restitution to the descendants of
formerly enslaved Africans, if warranted, based on the findings
of the Subcommittee. If the Subcommittee finds that any form of
rehabilitation or restitution is warranted, then the form and scope of
such measures.
3. The Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education shall
include the findings and recommendations of the Subcommittee
presented pursuant to subsection 2 in the report for the 2025-2026
interim submitted by the Joint Interim Standing Committee on
Education pursuant to NRS 218E.330.
4. The Subcommittee may conduct investigations and hold
hearings in connection with its functions and duties and exercise any
of the investigative powers set forth in NRS 218E.105 to 218E.140,
inclusive.
5. The Subcommittee may collaborate and consult with and
invite participation by historians, scholars and any other interested
parties.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
6. Each state agency, as defined in NRS 277.186, shall
cooperate with the Subcommittee and timely provide any
information that may be requested by the Subcommittee relating to
its duties.
7. The Subcommittee may:
(a) Request assistance from the Division of State Library,
Archives and Public Records of the Department of Administration.
Upon such a request, the Division shall provide to the
Subcommittee such assistance to the extent that resources are
available.
(b) Direct the Legislative Counsel Bureau to assist in its
research, investigations, review and analysis.
8. The Subcommittee may apply for any available grants and
accept any gifts, grants or donations to assist the Subcommittee in
carrying out its duties.
Secs. 3 and 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1.9 to 4, inclusive, of this act become effective on
July 1, 2025, and expire by limitation on December 31, 2026.
3. Sections 1 to 1.8, inclusive, of this act become effective on
October 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)